Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA-MADE FERTILIZER GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of agriculture must establish and implement the Minnesota-made fertilizer grant program. The commissioner may award a grant of up to $....... to an applicant to manufacture, process, and handle fertilizer while operating in Minnesota. The goal of the grant program is to increase the supply of fertilizer produced locally. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant, an applicant must operate in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) Priority must be given to applicants that supply fertilizer to agricultural producers for use in crop years 2026 and thereafter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to award Minnesota-made fertilizer grants under section 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end